sk-SK: Podkladový materiál pre nášivky: Plátno; Bavlna; Rifľovina; Umelá koža; Plsť; Koža; Sieťovina; Netkaná textília; Plast; Polyester; Satén; Keper; Iné
it: Materiale del supporto della toppa: Tela; Cotone; Denim; Similpelle; Feltro; Pelle; Mesh; Tessuto non tessuto; Plastica; Poliestere; Raso; Twill; Altro
hu: Felvarró hátlap anyaga: Vászon; Pamut; Farmer; Műbőr; Filc; Bőr; Háló; Nem szőtt; Műanyag; Poliészter; Szatén; Sávoly; Egyéb
de: Grundmaterial des Patches: Canvas; Baumwolle; Denim; Kunstleder; Filz; Leder; Mesh; Vliesstoff; Kunststoff; Polyester; Satin; Twill; Sonstige
sl-SI: Material hrbtne strani emblemske krpe: Platno; Bombaž; Denim; Umetno usnje; Polst; Usnje; Mrežica; Netkani material; Plastika; Poliester; Saten; Keper; Drugo
ja: パッチバック素材: キャンバス; コットン; デニム; フェイクレザー; フェルト; レザー; メッシュ; 不織布; プラスチック; ポリエステル; サテン; ツイル; その他
hr-HR: Materijal podloge zakrpe: Platno; Pamuk; Traper; Umjetna koža; Filc; Koža; Mrežica; Netkani materijal; Plastika; Poliester; Saten; Keper; Ostalo
lt-LT: Lopo pagrindo medžiaga: Drobė; Medvilnė; Džinsas; Dirbtinė oda; Veltinis; Oda; Tinklelis; Neaustinė medžiaga; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Satinas; Ruoželis; Kita
ru: Материал основы патча: Канвас; Хлопок; Деним; Искусственная кожа; Фетр; Кожа; Сетка; Нетканый материал; Пластик; Полиэстер; Атлас/сатин; Твил; Другое
vi: Vật liệu lót miếng vá: Canvas; Cotton; Denim; Giả da; Vải nỉ; Da; Lưới; Vải không dệt; Nhựa; Polyester; Satin; Vải twill; Khác
pl: Materiał podkładki naszywki: Płótno; Bawełna; Denim; Sztuczna skóra; Filc; Skóra; Siatka; Włóknina; Plastik; Poliester; Satyna; Diagonal; Inne
bg-BG: Материал на основата на нашивката: Платно; Памук; Деним; Изкуствена кожа; Филц; Кожа; Мрежа; Нетъкан текстил; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Сатен; Кепър; Друго
es: Material de soporte del parche: Lona; Algodón; Mezclilla; Piel sintética; Fieltro; Cuero; Malla; Tela no tejida; Plástico; Poliéster; Satén; Sarga; Otro
pt-BR: Patch, material protetor: Lona; Algodão; Jeans; Couro sintético; Feltro; Couro; Malha; Tecido não tecido; Plástico; Poliéster; Cetim; Sarja; Outro
en: Patch backing material: Canvas; Cotton; Denim; Faux leather; Felt; Leather; Mesh; Nonwoven; Plastic; Polyester; Satin; Twill; Other
ko: 패치 뒷면 소재: 캔버스; 면; 데님; 인조 가죽; 펠트; 가죽; 메시; 부직포; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 새틴; 트윌; 기타
fi: Merkin taustamateriaali: Kanvas; Puuvilla; Farkkukangas; Tekonahka; Huopa; Nahka; Verkkokangas; Kuitukangas; Muovi; Polyesteri; Satiini; Tvilli; Muu
ro-RO: Material de suport pentru plasture: Pânză; Bumbac; Denim; Piele ecologică; Pâslă; Piele; Plasă; Material nețesut; Plastic; Poliester; Satin; Twill; Altele
zh-TW: 貼片背膠材質: 帆布; 棉布; 丹寧; 合成皮; 毛氈; 皮革; 網眼; 不織布; 塑膠; 聚酯纖維; 緞面; 斜紋布; 其他
fr: Support de patch: Toile; Coton; Denim; Similicuir; Feutre; Cuir; Maille; Intissé; Plastique; Polyester; Satin; Sergé; Autre
tr: Yama arka yüzey malzemesi: Kanvas; Pamuk; Denim; Suni deri; Keçe; Deri; File; Dokumasız (nonwoven); Plastik; Polyester; Saten; Dimi; Diğer
th: วัสดุรองด้านหลังอาร์มปักลาย: ผ้าแคนวาส; ผ้าฝ้าย; ผ้าเดนิม; หนังเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; หนัง; ผ้าตาข่าย; ผ้าไม่ทอ; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ผ้าซาติน; ผ้าทวิล; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Material de suporte do aplique: Lona; Algodão; Ganga; Imitação de pele; Feltro; Pele; Malha; Não tecido; Plástico; Poliéster; Cetim; Sarja; Outro
da: Bagsidemateriale for patch: Lærred; Bomuld; Denim; Kunstlæder; Filt; Læder; Net; Nonwoven; Plastik; Polyester; Satin; Twill; Andet
zh-CN: 贴片背衬材料: 帆布; 棉; 牛仔布; 人造皮革; 毛毡; 皮革; 网眼布; 无纺布; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 缎面; 斜纹布; 其他
nb: Bakmateriale for lapp: Lerret; Bomull; Denim; Kunstskinn; Filt; Skinn; Netting; Ikke-vevd; Plast; Polyester; Sateng; Twill; Annet
el: Υλικό βάσης του επιθέματος: Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι; Τζιν; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Τσόχα; Δέρμα; Δίχτυ; Μη υφασμένο; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Σατέν; Twill; Άλλο
nl: Materiaal patch-achterkant: Canvas; Katoen; Denim; Kunstleer; Vilt; Leer; Mesh; Non-woven; Plastic; Polyester; Satijn; Keperstof; Overig
cs: Podkladový materiál náplasti: Plátno; Bavlna; Džínovina; Umělá kůže; Plsť; Kůže; Síťovina; Netkaná textilie; Plast; Polyester; Satén; Kepr; Ostatní
sv: Material på baksida av tygmärke: Kanvas; Bomull; Denim; Konstläder; Filt; Läder; Mesh; Non-woven; Plast; Polyester; Satin; Twill; Övrigt